Hawaii, session 2026, SB421.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that in 1853, an estimated seventy-five per cent of the population over the age of sixteen in the Kingdom of Hawaii was literate.  By 1878, eighty per cent of the population was literate in Hawaiian, English, or a European language, making Hawaii one of the most literate nations in the world at the time.  To preserve and honor this rich educational legacy, the department of education is committed to ensuring that all students are proficient in reading by the time they graduate high school.  Providing teachers and students with the necessary support will place the State one step closer to revitalizing the historically high literacy rates across the State. Presently, approximately just over half of Hawaii's students are at a proficient reading level.  While the department of education offers special education services to students with learning or developmental disabilities, some families may be unaware that the student has difficulty with reading proficiency because of a learning disability.  To improve student reading proficiency, it is necessary to address the causes that contribute to the present levels of poor reading proficiency rates.  A proactive and systematic approach is required to achieve high literacy rates for all students. Further, the department of education is striving to address poor reading proficiency rates by administering a general English language arts universal screening at the beginning, middle, and end of the school year for all students in grades kindergarten through nine.  The purpose of this screening is to identify students who might be at-risk for reading failure and to provide evidence-based intervention to support these students in core structured literacy instruction. However, general English language arts universal screenings are not able to detect or identify students who may have underlying language challenges that impact learning such as dyslexia.  As students with dyslexia or other developmental language disorders may require further intensive support or an individualized intervention program to address the causes of their reading challenges, additional screening may be necessary to ensure all students can become proficient in reading. The legislature further finds that Hawaii is the only state in the United States that does not have laws specific to dyslexia to support students who have difficulty with English language arts. Evidence shows that students who are not identified as having dyslexia and who do not achieve reading proficiency by third grade face significantly lower chances of success in the future. However, a substantial body of evidence also indicates that, with effective assessment and instruction, all students can learn to read, including students with dyslexia or other language and literacy challenges. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to support students with dyslexia or other language and literacy challenges by: (1)  Requiring public schools to administer a department of education-approved dyslexia screening as part of the general English language arts universal screening process; (2)  Implementing evidence-based intervention for students who are identified as having dyslexia or students who are flagged as having language and literacy challenges through the Hawaii multi-tiered system of support framework; and (3)  Providing professional development for teachers to increase implementation of structured literacy instruction by offering pre-service teacher programs to train general and special education teacher candidates in structured literacy instruction. SECTION 2.  Chapter 302A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part II, subpart C, to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§302A- Dyslexia screening; professional development; pre-service requirements. (a) Beginning with the 2026-2027 school year, all public schools shall administer a qualified dyslexia screening tool approved by the department for all students in kindergarten through third grade.  The qualified dyslexia screening tool shall be administered in addition to, and as part of, the established universal screening process.  The qualified dyslexia screening tool shall include, as developmentally appropriate, the following: (1)  Phonological and phonemic awareness; (2)  Sound-symbol recognition; (3)  Alphabet knowledge; (4)  Decoding skills; (5)  Rapid naming skills, including letter naming and letter sound fluency; (6)  Encoding skills; (7)  Oral reading accuracy and fluency; and (8)  Oral language. (b)  The department shall continue to administer general English language arts universal screenings for students in kindergarten through ninth grade as outlined in the Hawaii multi-tiered system of support. (c)  The department shall provide evidence-based intervention for any student identified as struggling readers including students with dyslexia.  Intervention and progress monitoring of the student shall be implemented within the Hawaii multi-tiered system of support framework. (d)  Structured literacy instruction, as required under this section, shall involve detailed, step‑by‑step instruction necessary for developing strong reading and writing skills.  In addition to explicit and systematic instruction, a structured literacy approach shall provide multiple opportunities for students to practice a skill or strategy and require teachers to provide immediate, specific feedback to students and continuously monitor progress. (e)  The department shall provide professional learning opportunities for all complex areas and public schools on the implementation of structured literacy instruction, which shall include evidence-based intervention. (f)  The department shall collaborate with pre-service teacher programs in the State to ensure general and special education teacher candidates are trained on the implementation of structured literacy instruction, which shall include evidence-based intervention to support all students." SECTION 3.  Section 302A-101, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding four new definitions to be appropriately inserted and to read as follows: ""Dyslexia" means a specific learning disability that is neurological in origin and characterized by difficulties with accurate or fluent word recognition and by poor spelling and decoding abilities. These difficulties typically result from a deficit in the phonological component of language and literacy development that is often unexpected in relation to other cognitive abilities and the provision of effective classroom instruction.  Secondary consequences may include problems in reading comprehension and reduced reading experience that can impede the growth of vocabulary and background knowledge. "Hawaii multi-tiered system of support" means a comprehensive continuum of evidence-based, systemic practices to support a rapid response to a student's needs, with regular observation to facilitate data-based instructional decision-making. "Phonological component of language and literacy development" means the ability to recognize that a spoken word consists of a sequence of individual sounds and whether the student possesses the ability to manipulate individual sounds when speaking. "Structured literacy instruction" means an evidence-based approach that emphasizes explicit and systematic instruction in the following components of literacy: (1)  Phonological awareness; (2)  Phonics (decoding and spelling); (3)  Fluency; (4)  Vocabulary; (5)  Comprehension; and (6)  Written expression." SECTION 4.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the administration of dyslexia-sensitive universal screening. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of education for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 5.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 6.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2050.